Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-435
Court-martial; record; action on.

After a trial by court-martial the record shall be forwarded to the convening authority, and action thereon may be taken by the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being, a successor in command, or any officer exercising court-martial jurisdiction.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 35, p. 1569.